Hawaii statutes.
[§346-104] Refusal to work; ineligibility
for public assistance. The department shall adopt rules pursuant to
chapter 91 rendering any person ineligible for public assistance if the person
refuses to accept suitable work as provided by public service employment
without justifiable reason. [L 1973, c 177, pt of §2; gen ch 1985]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next